Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1209
Applications for social services; information; safeguarded.

Information regarding applicants for or recipients of social services shall be safeguarded and shall be used only for purposes connected with the administration of social services.

Laws 1973, LB 511, § 9.